Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 7
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
ADVISORY COUNCIL

27-50-701. Behavioral health administration advisory council - creation.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the behavioral health administration advisory council, referred to in this part 7 as the "advisory council", for the purpose of making recommendations to the commissioner and the state board of human services to improve the behavioral health system for children, youth, and adults throughout Colorado.

The advisory council shall receive routine briefings from the commissioner on the progress of the BHA and behavioral health reform efforts, including updates related to performance data collected pursuant to section 27-50-201 and related to formal agreements and collaborations with state agencies pursuant to this article 50, and may provide feedback as a method to ensure accountability and transparency. Other advisory council duties include:

Providing diverse community input on challenges, gaps, and potential solutions to inform the BHA's vision and strategic plan;

Establishing working groups to support the BHA in problem solving and developing solutions;

Ensuring there is public accountability and transparency through reviewing the BHA's public-facing transparency activities, including the performance data collected pursuant to section 27-50-201; and

Preparing an annual report of recommendations and submitting it to the BHA by September 1 of each year. The report shall be included in the BHA's annual behavioral health system plan pursuant to section 27-50-204 (1).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1481, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-702. Advisory council - membership.

The advisory council membership must be reflective of the demographic and geographic populations of this state to ensure ongoing stakeholder input and involvement.

The advisory council consists of not less than fifteen members and not more than twenty members appointed by the commissioner for three-year terms; except that some of the initial terms may be for two years. In addition to maintaining a majority of members who represent individuals with lived behavioral health experience or families of individuals with lived behavioral health experience, the commissioner shall appoint at least one member that represents:

Rural communities;

Each tribal government within Colorado;

County governments;

Persons with disabilities, as defined in section 24-34-301 (2.5), a family member of a person with a disability, or an advocacy organization for persons with disabilities;

The Colorado state judicial branch, in consultation with the state court administrator's office;

Behavioral health safety net providers;

Persons with expertise in the behavioral health needs of children and youth; and

Persons with expertise in crime victimization, trauma, or adverse childhood experiences as they impact the victim's lifetime.

In making appointments to the advisory council, the commissioner shall consider including members that represent the racial and ethnic diversity of the state; that represent the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or queer or questioning community; that are involved in the criminal or juvenile justice system; and that represent other populations with health disparities.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1482, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-703. Advisory council - regional subcommittees - subcommittees - working groups.

The BHA shall create one regional subcommittee of the advisory council for each behavioral health administrative services organization region established pursuant to section 27-50-401. Regional subcommittee members are appointed by the commissioner for three-year terms; except that initial terms may be for two years. Each regional subcommittee consists of five members. Membership of the regional subcommittees must include:

At least one individual with expertise in the behavioral health needs of children and youth;

At least one individual who represents a behavioral health safety net provider that operates within the region; and

A county commissioner of a county situated within the region.

The BHA may create committees within the advisory council to meet other state and federal board or advisory council requirements, which may include:

The behavioral health planning and advisory council, authorized pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 300x-3;

The mental health advisory board for service standards and rules created pursuant to section 27-65-130; and

The child and youth mental health services standards advisory board created pursuant to section 27-67-109.

Each committee membership shall maintain a majority of members who represent individuals with lived behavioral health experience or families of individuals with lived behavioral health experience.

The advisory council has the authority to create advisory council workgroups focused on topics of need as determined by the advisory council in collaboration with the BHA.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1482, § 1, effective July 1.